test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenevasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневарбида
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневарбини’
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневарбиди’
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневарбиди’
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневарбина”
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневарбида”
     теневась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневарбидо’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневаӈгув
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневаӈгур
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневаӈгуда
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневаӈгуми’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневаӈгури’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневаӈгуди’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневаӈгува”
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневаӈгура”
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудо’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюн
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюд
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюда
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюни’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюди’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюди’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюна”
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюда”
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдо’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневаӈгун
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневаӈгуд
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневаӈгуда
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневаӈгуни’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневаӈгуди’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневаӈгуди’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневаӈгуна”
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневаӈгуда”
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудо’
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: теневаӈгувась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневаӈгурась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: теневаӈгуминзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: теневаӈгуринзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: теневаӈгуваць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: теневаӈгураць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: теневаӈгудонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюнась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюнинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюнаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: теневаӈгухуюдонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: теневаӈгунась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневаӈгудась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудась
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: теневаӈгунинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневаӈгудинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудинзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: теневаӈгунаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневаӈгудаць
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневаӈгудонзь
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэв, теневаӈгоданакэв]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэр, теневаӈгоданакэр]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэда, теневаӈгоданакэда]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэми’, теневаӈгоданакэми’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэри’, теневаӈгоданакэри’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэди’, теневаӈгоданакэди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэва”, теневаӈгоданакэва”]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэра”, теневаӈгоданакэра”]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: [теневаӈгодакэдо’, теневаӈгоданакэдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюн, теневаӈгоданакэхэюн]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюд, теневаӈгоданакэхэюд]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюда, теневаӈгоданакэхэюда]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюни’, теневаӈгоданакэхэюни’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюди’, теневаӈгоданакэхэюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюди’, теневаӈгоданакэхэюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюна”, теневаӈгоданакэхэюна”]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюда”, теневаӈгоданакэхэюда”]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [теневаӈгодакэхэюдо’, теневаӈгоданакэхэюдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакын, теневаӈгоданакын]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыд, теневаӈгоданакыд]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыда, теневаӈгоданакыда]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыни’, теневаӈгоданакыни’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыди’, теневаӈгоданакыди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыди’, теневаӈгоданакыди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакына”, теневаӈгоданакына”]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыда”, теневаӈгоданакыда”]
     теневась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [теневаӈгодакыдо’, теневаӈгоданакыдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcSg3: [теневахарцюв, теневахарцяв]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcSg3: [теневахарцюми’, теневахарцями’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcSg3: [теневахарцюва”, теневахарцява”]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcDu3: [теневахарцюхуюн, теневахарцяхаюн]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcDu3: [теневахарцюхуюни’, теневахарцяхаюни’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcDu3: [теневахарцюхуюна”, теневахарцяхаюна”]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcPl3: [теневахарцюн, теневахарцян]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcPl3: [теневахарцюни’, теневахарцяни’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcPl3: [теневахарцюна”, теневахарцяна”]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: теневахарт
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [теневахар”ӈари’, теневахарӈари’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [теневахар”ӈара”, теневахарӈара”]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: теневахаркаюн”
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [теневахар”ӈахаюди’, теневахарӈахаюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [теневахар”ӈахаюда”, теневахарӈахаюда”]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: теневахаран”
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: теневахаръяди’
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: теневахаръяда”
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3: [теневахар”ӈамда, теневахарӈамда]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcSg3: [теневахар”ӈамди’, теневахарӈамди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3: [теневахар”ӈамдо’, теневахарӈамдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcDu3: [теневахар”ӈахаюдамда, теневахарӈахаюдамда]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcDu3: [теневахар”ӈахаюдамди’, теневахарӈахаюдамди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcDu3: [теневахар”ӈахаюдамдо’, теневахарӈахаюдамдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: теневахаръядамда
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcPl3: теневахаръядамди’
     теневась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: теневахаръядамдо’
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: [теневасьтыв, теневасетыв]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: [теневасьтыр, теневасетыр]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: [теневасьтыда, теневасетыда]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: [теневасьтыми’, теневасетыми’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: [теневасьтыри’, теневасетыри’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: [теневасьтыди’, теневасетыди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: [теневасьтыва”, теневасетыва”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: [теневасьтыра”, теневасетыра”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: [теневасьтыдо’, теневасетыдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюн, теневасетыхыюн]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюд, теневасетыхыюд]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюда, теневасетыхыюда]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюни’, теневасетыхыюни’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюди’, теневасетыхыюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюди’, теневасетыхыюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюна”, теневасетыхыюна”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюда”, теневасетыхыюда”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [теневасьтыхыюдо’, теневасетыхыюдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: [теневасьтын, теневасетын]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: [теневасьтыд, теневасетыд]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: [теневасьтыда, теневасетыда]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [теневасьтыни’, теневасетыни’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [теневасьтыди’, теневасетыди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [теневасьтыди’, теневасетыди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [теневасьтына”, теневасетына”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [теневасьтыда”, теневасетыда”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [теневасьтыдо’, теневасетыдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэв, теневасетавэв]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэр, теневасетавэр]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэда, теневасетавэда]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэми’, теневасетавэми’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэри’, теневасетавэри’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэди’, теневасетавэди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэва”, теневасетавэва”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэра”, теневасетавэра”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcSg3: [теневасьтавэдо’, теневасетавэдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюн, теневасетавэхэюн]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюд, теневасетавэхэюд]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюда, теневасетавэхэюда]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюни’, теневасетавэхэюни’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюди’, теневасетавэхэюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюди’, теневасетавэхэюди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюна”, теневасетавэхэюна”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюда”, теневасетавэхэюда”]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcDu3: [теневасьтавэхэюдо’, теневасетавэхэюдо’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcPl3: [теневасьтавын, теневасетавын]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcPl3: [теневасьтавыд, теневасетавыд]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcPl3: [теневасьтавыда, теневасетавыда]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcPl3: [теневасьтавыни’, теневасетавыни’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcPl3: [теневасьтавыди’, теневасетавыди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcPl3: [теневасьтавыди’, теневасетавыди’]
     теневась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcPl3: [теневасьтавына”, теневасетавына”]
